Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
General Provisions

§ 21-27-1.
No franchise or right to be exclusive, without compensation, or longer than 25 years.

No municipality shall have the power to grant to any person, firm or corporation any exclusive franchise or any exclusive right to use or occupy the streets, highways, bridges, or public places in such municipality for any purpose. No municipality shall grant, renew, or extend any such franchise, privilege or right, without compensation or for any longer period than twenty-five years.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable to all municipalities of this state, whether operating under a code charter, special charter, or the commission form of government, except in cases of conflict between the provisions of this section and the provisions of the special charter of a municipality, or the law governing the commission form of government, in which cases of conflict the provisions of the special charter or the statutes relative to the commission form of government shall control.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6056; 1930, § 2644; 1942, §§ 3374-85, 3374-111; Laws, 1912, ch. 120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 85, 111, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-3.
Poles, posts and wires.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to grant the right for the erection of telegraph, electric light, or telephone poles, posts and wires along and upon any of the streets, alleys, or ways of the municipality, and change, modify, and regulate the same. However, such privilege shall not be exclusive, and no such privilege shall be granted for a longer term than twenty-five years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2932; 1906, § 3323; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5820; 1930, § 2400; 1942, § 3374-119; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 119, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-5.
Pipes, conduits and pipe lines.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to grant to any person, corporation, or association, on such terms and conditions as the governing authorities may prescribe, the use of the streets, alleys and other public grounds for the purpose of laying, constructing, repairing and maintaining gas, water, sewer, or steam pipes, or conduits for electric light, telegraph and telephone lines, and pipe lines for the purpose of transporting crude oil, crude petroleum, kerosene, gasoline, and other commodities transportable by pipe line. However, such franchise, right-of-way or privilege of any character whatsoever shall not be granted for a longer period than twenty-five years, and such privilege shall not be exclusive.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2933; 1906, § 3324; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5821; 1930, § 2401; 1942, § 3374-120; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 120, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-27-7.
Waterworks.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to erect, purchase, maintain and operate waterworks, and to regulate the same, to prescribe the rates at which water shall be supplied to the inhabitants, and to acquire by purchase, donation or condemnation, in the name of the municipality, suitable grounds, within or without the corporate limits, upon which to erect waterworks, and also the right-of-way to and from such works and the right-of-way for laying water pipes within the corporate limits, and from such waterworks to the municipality, and to extend such right-of-way from time to time. The governing authorities shall have the power to contract with any person for the maintenance and operation of waterworks. Said authorities shall have the power to contract with any person for the erection and maintenance of waterworks for a term not exceeding twenty-five (25) years, fixing water rates in the contract subject to municipal regulations. A contract for the erection or purchase of waterworks shall not, however, be entered into until submitted to a vote of the qualified electors and approved by a majority of those voting. A contract for maintenance under which the person who will perform such maintenance is wholly or partially responsible for fixing water rates shall not be entered into until submitted to a vote of the qualified electors and approved by a majority of those voting. It shall be unlawful for any municipally owned waterworks to supply water free of charge, or in any amount less than the fixed charges, to any person, firm or corporation, except as is expressly authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2948; 1906, § 3339; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5836; 1930, § 2415; 1942, § 3374-130; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 130; Laws, 1976, ch. 458; Laws, 1987, ch. 525, § 1, eff from and after October 20, 1987 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objections to this amendment).

§ 21-27-9.
Testing of water, electric and gas meters; authority to prosecute persons for tampering with meters.

If, upon complaint of any citizen or citizens interested, the governing authorities of any municipality find that there is reasonable ground for believing that any meter or meters intended to measure or register the quantity of water, electric light or power, or gas supplied or furnished by any individual, company or corporation to the municipality or its inhabitants is or are measuring or registering incorrectly or excessively or is or are of a less candle power or degree of brilliancy than required by contract, such governing authorities may employ an expert, who shall examine and test said meter or meters, or said light or lights, as the case may be, and report back to said governing authorities, notice of the time and place of the proposed test or tests being first given to all parties interested. If such examination or test shall show the fact that said meter or meters measure or register incorrectly or excessively, or that said light or lights are of a less candle power or brilliancy than required by contract, then all expenses of such examination and test incurred by said municipal governing authorities shall be charged against and collected back from said individual, company or corporation supplying or furnishing such water, electric light or power, or gas, as the case may be, and such penalties may be imposed as the municipal ordinances may provide.

The governing authorities of any municipality are authorized to prosecute any person tampering with electric, gas or water meters as provided in Section 97-25-3.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3353; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5850; 1930, § 2429; 1942, § 3374-141; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 141; Laws, 1992, ch. 385, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.